Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 1. Homicide.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to withdrawal or withholding of cardiopulmonary resuscitation or other life-sustaining procedures, see AS

13.52.045

.

Collateral references. —

40 Am. Jur. 2d, Homicide, § 1 et seq.

40 C.J.S., Homicide, § 1 et seq.

Inference of malice or intent to kill where killing is by blow without weapon, 22 ALR2d 854.

Criminal responsibility for injury or death resulting from hunting accident,
23 ALR2d 1401.

Causing one, by threats or fright, to leap or fall to his death, 25 ALR2d 1186.

Pregnancy as element of abortion or homicide based thereon, 46 ALR2d 1393.

Fright or shock, homicide by, 47 ALR2d 1072.

Homicide by juvenile as within jurisdiction of juvenile court, 48 ALR2d 663.

Presumption of deliberation or premeditation from the fact of killing, 86 ALR2d 656.

Criminal liability of parent, teacher, or one in loco parentis for homicide by excessive or improper punishment inflicted on child, 89 ALR2d 396.

Medical or surgical attention, failure to provide, 100 ALR2d 483.

Insulting words as provocation of homicide or as reducing the degree thereof, 2 ALR3d 1292.

Private person’s authority, in making arrest for felony, to shoot or kill alleged felon, 32 ALR3d 1078.

Homicide predicated on improper treatment of disease or injury, 45 ALR3d 114.

Use of set gun, trap or similar device on defendant’s own property,
47 ALR3d 646.

Criminal liability where act of killing is done by one resisting felony or other unlawful act committed by defendant, 56 ALR3d 239.

Withholding food, clothing, or shelter, homicide by, 61 ALR3d 1207.

What constitutes “imminently dangerous” act within homicide statute, 67 ALR3d 900.

Degree of homicide as affected by accused’s religious or occult belief in harmlessness of ceremonial ritualistic acts directly causing fatal injury, 78 ALR3d 1132.

Spouse’s confession of adultery as affecting degree of homicide involved in killing spouse or his or her paramour, 93 ALR3d 925.

Criminal responsibility for physical measures undertaken in connection with treatment of mentally disordered patient, 99 ALR3d 854.

Pocket or clasp knife as deadly or dangerous weapon for purposes of statute aggravating offense such as assault, robbery, or homicide, 100 ALR3d 287.

Duty to retreat where assailant is social guest on premises, 100 ALR3d 532.

Necessity or propriety of bifurcated criminal trial on issue of insanity defense, 1 ALR4th 884.

Criminal liability for injury or death caused by operation of pleasure boat, 8 ALR4th 886.

Homicide as precluding taking under will or by intestacy, 25 ALR4th 787.

Homicide by causing victim’s brain-dead condition,
42 ALR4th 742.

Corporation’s criminal liability for homicide, 45 ALR4th 1021.

Judicial power to order discontinuance of life-sustaining treatment, 48 ALR4th 67.

Employer’s liability to employee or agent for injury or death resulting from assault or criminal attack by third person, 40 ALR5th 1.

Criminal liability for death resulting from unlawful furnishing intoxicating liquor or drugs to another, 29 ALR7th 8.

Sec. 11.41.100.
Murder in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of murder in the first degree if

with intent to cause the death of another person, the person

causes the death of any person; or

compels or induces any person to commit suicide through duress or deception;

the person knowingly engages in conduct directed toward a child under the age of 16 and the person with criminal negligence inflicts serious physical injury on the child by at least two separate acts, and one of the acts results in the death of the child;

acting alone or with one or more persons, the person commits or attempts to commit a sexual offense against or kidnapping of a child under 16 years of age and, in the course of or in furtherance of the offense or in immediate flight from that offense, any person causes the death of the child; in this paragraph, “sexual offense” means an offense defined in AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.470

;

acting alone or with one or more persons, the person commits or attempts to commit criminal mischief in the first degree under AS

11.46.475

and, in the course of or in furtherance of the offense or in immediate flight from that offense, any person causes the death of a person other than one of the participants; or

acting alone or with one or more persons, the person commits terroristic threatening in the first degree under AS

11.56.807

and, in the course of or in furtherance of the offense or in immediate flight from that offense, any person causes the death of a person other than one of the participants.

Murder in the first degree is an unclassified felony and is punishable as provided in AS 12.55.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 67 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 54 SLA 1999; am § 3 ch 92 SLA 2002)

Cross references. —

Definition of “deception” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “person” - AS

11.41.140

Murder in the second degree - AS

11.41.110

Manslaughter - AS

11.41.120

Criminally negligent homicide - AS

11.41.130

Term of imprisonment for murder in the first degree - AS

12.55.125(a)

Authorized fine for murder in the first degree - AS

12.55.035(b)(1)

Original Code Provisions - AS

11.15.010

; AS 11.15.030; AS 11.15.050

TD: I, 25-27.

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For applicability provisions relating to the 1999 amendment of subsection (a), see § 16, ch. 54, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.For applicability provisions relating to the 1999 amendment of subsection (a), see § 16, ch. 54, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Sec. 11.41.110.
Murder in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of murder in the second degree if

with intent to cause serious physical injury to another person or knowing that the conduct is substantially certain to cause death or serious physical injury to another person, the person causes the death of any person;

the person knowingly engages in conduct that results in the death of another person under circumstances manifesting an extreme indifference to the value of human life;

under circumstances not amounting to murder in the first degree under AS

11.41.100(a)(3)

, while acting either alone or with one or more persons, the person commits or attempts to commit arson in the first degree, kidnapping, sexual assault in the first degree, sexual assault in the second degree, sexual abuse of a minor in the first degree, sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree, burglary in the first degree, escape in the first or second degree, robbery in any degree, or misconduct involving a controlled substance under AS

11.71.010(a)

,

11.71.021(a)

,

11.71.030(a)(2)

or (9), or

11.71.040(a)(1)

or (2) and, in the course of or in furtherance of that crime or in immediate flight from that crime, any person causes the death of a person other than one of the participants;

acting with a criminal street gang, the person commits or attempts to commit a crime that is a felony and, in the course of or in furtherance of that crime or in immediate flight from that crime, any person causes the death of a person other than one of the participants; or

the person with criminal negligence causes the death of a child under the age of 16, and the person has been previously convicted of a crime involving a child under the age of 16 that was

a felony violation of AS 11.41;

in violation of a law or ordinance in another jurisdiction with elements similar to a felony under AS 11.41; or

an attempt, a solicitation, or a conspiracy to commit a crime listed in (A) or (B) of this paragraph.

Murder in the second degree is an unclassified felony and is punishable as provided in AS 12.55.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 1988; am § 5 ch 4 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 60 SLA 1996; am § 4 ch 54 SLA 1999; am § 4 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 2 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “serious physical injury” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally,” “knowingly” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “person” - AS

11.41.140

Defenses to murder - AS

11.41.115

Manslaughter - AS

11.41.120

Criminally negligent homicide - AS

11.41.130

Robbery in the first and second degree - AS

11.41.500

,

11.41.510

Arson in the first degree - AS

11.46.400

Sexual assault in the first degree - AS

11.41.410

Sexual assault in the second degree - AS

11.41.420

Burglary in the first degree - AS

11.46.300

Escape in the first and second degree - AS

11.56.300

,

11.56.310

Sentence of imprisonment for murder in the second degree - AS

12.55.125(b)

Authorized fine for murder in the second degree - AS

12.55.035(b)

Original Code Provision - AS

11.15.010

.

TD: I, 27-29.

For punishment of unclassified felonies, see AS

12.55.125(b)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For applicability provisions relating to the 1999 amendment of subsection (a), see § 16, ch. 54, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (a)(3), substituted “11.71.030(a)(1), (2), or (4) — (8)” for “11.71.020(a), 11.17.030(a)(1) or (2).”

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (a)(3), substituted “11.71.021(a), 11.71.030(a)(2) or (9)” for “11.71.030(a)(1), (2), or (4) — (8).”

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(a), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of paragraph (a)(3) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Legislative history reports. —

For House letter of intent on ch. 66, SLA 1988 (CSHB 237 (Jud)), which amended this section, see 1988 House Journal 2330-2333.

Sec. 11.41.115.
Defenses to murder.

In a prosecution under AS

11.41.100(a)(1)(A)

or

11.41.110(a)(1)

, it is a defense that the defendant acted in a heat of passion, before there had been a reasonable opportunity for the passion to cool, when the heat of passion resulted from a serious provocation by the intended victim.

In a prosecution under AS

11.41.110(a)(3)

, it is an affirmative defense that the defendant

did not commit the homicidal act or in any way solicit or aid in its commission;

was not armed with a dangerous instrument;

had no reasonable ground to believe that another participant, if any, was armed with a dangerous instrument; and

had no reasonable ground to believe that another participant, if any, intended to engage in conduct likely to result in death or serious physical injury.

A person may not be convicted of murder in the second degree under AS

11.41.110(a)(3)

if the only underlying crime is burglary, the sole purpose of the burglary is a criminal homicide, and the person killed is the intended victim of the defendant. However, if the defendant causes the death of any other person, the defendant may be convicted of murder in the second degree under AS

11.41.110(a)(3)

. Nothing in this subsection precludes a prosecution for or conviction of murder in the first degree or murder in the second degree under AS

11.41.110(a)(1)

or (2) or of any other crime, including manslaughter or burglary.

[Repealed, § 44 ch 102 SLA 1980.]

Nothing in (a) or (b) of this section precludes a prosecution for or conviction of manslaughter or any other crime not specifically precluded.

In this section,

“intended victim” means a person whom the defendant was attempting to kill or to whom the defendant was attempting to cause serious physical injury when the defendant caused the death of the person the defendant is charged with killing;

“serious provocation” means conduct which is sufficient to excite an intense passion in a reasonable person in the defendant’s situation, other than a person who is intoxicated, under the circumstances as the defendant reasonably believed them to be; insulting words, insulting gestures, or hearsay reports of conduct engaged in by the intended victim do not, alone or in combination with each other, constitute serious provocation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978; am §§ 3, 44 ch 102 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 67 SLA 1988)

Cross references. —

Definition of “defense,” “affirmative defense,” “solicit,” “dangerous instrument,” “serious physical injury,” “intoxicated” - AS

11.81.900(b)

.

Murder in the first and second degree - AS

11.41.100

,

11.41.110

Manslaughter - AS

11.41.120

Burglary in the first and second degree - AS

11.46.300

,

11.46.310

Justification defenses - AS

11.81.300

—

11.81.430

Original Code Provision - AS 11.15.110.

TD: I, 29-32.

For use of deadly force in defense of self as justification of conduct, see AS

11.81.335

.

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 28, 1980.

Sec. 11.41.120.
Manslaughter.

A person commits the crime of manslaughter if the person

intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly causes the death of another person under circumstances not amounting to murder in the first or second degree;

intentionally aids another person to commit suicide; or

knowingly manufactures or delivers a controlled substance in violation of AS

11.71.010

—

11.71.030

or

11.71.040(a)(1)

for schedule IVA controlled substances, and a person dies as a direct result of ingestion of the controlled substance; the death is a result that does not require a culpable mental state; in this paragraph, “ingestion” means voluntarily or involuntarily taking a substance into the body in any manner.

Manslaughter is a class A felony.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 3 ch 53 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A felonies, see AS

12.55.125(c)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 22, ch. 53, SLA 2006, provides that paragraph (a)(3) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after June 3, 2006.”

Sec. 11.41.130.
Criminally negligent homicide.

A person commits the crime of criminally negligent homicide if, with criminal negligence, the person causes the death of another person.

Criminally negligent homicide is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 5 ch 54 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

Original Code Provisions - AS 11.15.040; AS 11.15.080; AS 11.15.050.

TD: I, 33-35.

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For applicability provisions relating to the 1999 amendment of subsection (b), see § 16, ch. 54, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Sec. 11.41.135.
Multiple deaths.

If more than one person dies as a result of a person committing conduct constituting a crime specified in AS

11.41.100

—

11.41.130

, each death constitutes a separately punishable offense.

History.

(§ 1 ch 143 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

Murder in the first and second degree - AS

11.41.100

,

11.41.110

Manslaughter - AS

11.41.120

Criminally negligent homicide - AS

11.41.130

For definitions of terms used in this title, see AS

11.81.900

.

Sec. 11.41.140.
Definition.

In AS

11.41.100

—

11.41.140

“person”, when referring to the victim of a crime, means a human being who has been born and was alive at the time of the criminal act.
A person is “alive” if there is spontaneous respiratory or cardiac function or, when respiratory and cardiac functions are maintained by artificial means, there is spontaneous brain function.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Murder in the first and second degree - AS

11.41.100

,

11.41.110

Manslaughter - AS

11.41.120

Criminally negligent homicide - AS

11.41.130

Definition of “serious physical injury” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Abortions - AS

18.16.010

Original Code Provision - None.

TD: I, 23-24.

For definition of terms used in this title, see AS

11.81.900

.

Sec. 11.41.150.
Murder of an unborn child.

A person commits the crime of murder of an unborn child if the person

with intent to cause the death of an unborn child or of another person, causes the death of an unborn child;

with intent to cause serious physical injury to an unborn child or to another person or knowing that the conduct is substantially certain to cause death or serious physical injury to an unborn child or to another person, causes the death of an unborn child;

while acting alone or with one or more persons, commits or attempts to commit arson in the first degree, kidnapping, sexual assault in the first degree, sexual assault in the second degree, sexual abuse of a minor in the first degree, sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree, burglary in the first degree, escape in the first or second degree, robbery in any degree, or misconduct involving a controlled substance under AS

11.71.010(a)

,

11.71.021(a)

,

11.71.030(a)(2)

or (9), or

11.71.040(a)(1)

or (2), and, in the course of or in furtherance of that crime or in immediate flight from that crime, any person causes the death of an unborn child;

knowingly engages in conduct that results in the death of an unborn child under circumstances manifesting an extreme indifference to the value of human life; for purposes of this paragraph, a pregnant woman’s decision to remain in a relationship in which domestic violence, as defined in AS

18.66.990

, has occurred does not constitute conduct manifesting an extreme indifference to the value of human life.

A person may not be convicted under (a)(3) of this section if the only underlying crime is burglary, the sole purpose of the burglary is a criminal homicide, and the unborn child killed is the intended victim of the defendant. However, if the defendant causes the death of another unborn child, the defendant may be convicted under (a)(3) of this section. Nothing in this subsection precludes a prosecution for or conviction of murder in the first degree or murder in the second degree, murder of an unborn child under AS

11.41.150(a)(1)

, (2), or (4), or any other crime.

Murder of an unborn child is an unclassified felony.

History.

(§ 2 ch 73 SLA 2006; am § 5 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 3 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For punishment of unclassified felonies, see AS

12.55.125(b)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (a)(3), substituted “11.71.030(a)(1), (2), or (4) — (8)” for “11.71.020(a), 11.17.030(a)(1) or (2)”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (a)(3), substituted “11.71.021(a), 11.71.030(a)(2) or (9)” for “11.71.030(a)(1), (2), or (4) — (8).”

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of paragraph (a)(3) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.41.160.
Manslaughter of an unborn child.

A person commits the crime of manslaughter of an unborn child if, under circumstances not amounting to murder of an unborn child, the person intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly causes the death of an unborn child.

Manslaughter of an unborn child is a class A felony.

History.

(§ 2 ch 73 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A felonies, see AS

12.55.125(c)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.41.170.
Criminally negligent homicide of an unborn child.

A person commits the crime of criminally negligent homicide of an unborn child if, with criminal negligence, the person causes the death of an unborn child.

Criminally negligent homicide of an unborn child is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 2 ch 73 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.41.180.
Applicability of AS 11.41.150 — 11.41.170.

AS

11.41.150

—

11.41.170

do not apply to acts that

cause the death of an unborn child if those acts were committed during a legal abortion to which the pregnant woman consented or a person authorized by law to act on her behalf consented, or for which such consent is implied by law;

are committed under usual and customary standards of medical practice during diagnostic testing, therapeutic treatment, or to assist a pregnancy; or

are committed by a pregnant woman against herself and her own unborn child.

History.

(§ 2 ch 73 SLA 2006)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 1, ch. 73, SLA 2006 states that nothing in the Act “is intended to limit or alter a woman’s right to choose the outcome of her pregnancy, as guaranteed by the United States Supreme Court.”